Utah statutes.
71-10-3.   Willful failure to give preference a misdemeanor.

Any officers, agents, or representatives of a government entity who is charged with employment of people and who willfully fails to give preference as provided in this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 133, 1993 General Session

